Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4619.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. It shall be necessary for all All parties intending to be married to must obtain a marriage license from the county clerk of the county in which either the man or woman party desiring to be married resides, and to must deliver the said license to the clergyman clergy person or magistrate who is to officiate, before the marriage can be performed. If both parties to be married are non-residents nonresidents of the this state, it shall be necessary to a party must obtain such the license from the county clerk of the county in which the marriage is to be performed. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Joint Resolution ____ (request no. S00781'25) or House Joint Resolution F (request no. H00781'25) of the 103rd Legislature becomes a part of the state constitution of 1963 as provided in section 1 of article XII of the state constitution of 1963.